New Jersey, session 222, A859.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a. As used in this section, veteran means an individual who served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, a Reserve component thereof, or the National Guard, and who was honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service. b. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the State Board of Education shall establish a program permitting the State Board of Examiners to issue a temporary five-year teaching certificate to a veteran who is enrolled in an educator preparation program at a regionally accredited four-year institution of higher education in the State provided that the veteran: (1) has completed no less than four years of military service; (2) has completed a minimum of 60 college credits; and (3) has achieved a passing score on any applicable subject matter knowledge exams. c. A board of education may employ a veteran who has been issued a temporary teaching certificate pursuant to this section in a full-time or part-time teaching position. d. An educator preparation program shall accept as fulfillment of its clinical practice requirement, the teaching experience obtained by a veteran hired by a school district pursuant to this section. e. The State Board of Education shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), any rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this act. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.